Mississippi, session 2026, HB1413.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 25-1-77, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-1-77.  (1)  There is created the Bureau of Fleet Management within the Office of Purchasing, Travel and Fleet Management, Department of Finance and Administration, for the purposes of coordinating and promoting efficiency and economy in the purchase, lease, rental, acquisition, use, maintenance and disposal of vehicles by state agencies.  The Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration may employ a Fleet Management Officer to manage the bureau and carry out its purposes.  The bureau may employ other suitable and competent personnel as necessary.  The bureau shall encourage the use of fuel efficient or hybrid vehicles appropriate for the state agency's intended purpose and, when feasible, the use of alternative fuels or energy sources, including, but not limited to, ethanol, biodiesel, natural gas or electric power.  The bureau shall prepare a fiscal analysis of the cost-effectiveness of using alternative fuel or energy source vehicles by state agencies, and submit a report of that fiscal analysis to the Legislature by December 15, 2009.  Not later than July 1, 2014, at least seventy-five percent (75%) of all vehicles to which the bureau holds title in the name of the state must have a fuel economy estimate by the United States Environmental Protection Agency of forty (40) miles per gallon or higher for highway driving. (2)  The Bureau of Fleet Management shall perform the following duties: (a)  To hold title in the name of the State of Mississippi to all vehicles currently in possession of state agencies as defined in Section 25-9-107(d) and to assign vehicles to such agencies for use; however, the bureau shall exempt any agency or agency vehicles from the provisions of this paragraph (a) if it determines that state or federal law requires that title be vested only in the agency; (b)  To establish rules and regulations for state agency use of vehicles; (c)  To gather information and specify proper fleet management practices for state agencies; (d)  To acquire fleet management software and require agencies to provide necessary information for the bureau to properly monitor the size, use, maintenance and disposal of the state's fleet of vehicles; the bureau shall communicate regularly with the fleet managers of each state agency to determine strengths and weaknesses of the various fleet operations; the bureau shall disseminate information to the agencies so that each can take advantage of any beneficial practices being incorporated at other entities; the bureau shall promulgate rules and regulations concerning the mileage reimbursement practices of each state agency; (e)  To carry out responsibilities relative to budget recommendations as provided in Section 27-103-129; (f)  To reassign vehicles in the possession of any state agency if the bureau believes that another state agency can make more efficient use of a vehicle * * *.; (g)  To investigate at any time the vehicle usage practices of any state agency; and (h)  To require each agency to submit to the bureau a vehicle acquisition/use/disposal plan on an annual basis.  From the plans received, the bureau shall evaluate the proposed plans and shall submit a recommendation to the Legislature prior to January 1 of each year. (3)  No state department, institution or agency shall purchase, rent, lease or acquire any motor vehicle, regardless of the source of funds from which the motor vehicle is to be purchased, except under authority granted by the Department of Finance and Administration.  The Bureau of Fleet Management, Department of Finance and Administration, shall promulgate rules and regulations governing the purchase, rental, lease or acquisition of any motor vehicle by a state department, institution or agency with regard to the appropriateness of the vehicle to its intended use.  The Bureau of Fleet Management, Department of Finance and Administration, shall only grant authority to purchase, rent, lease or acquire a motor vehicle which is the lowest cost vehicle to carry out its intended use.  Before the disposal or sale of any vehicle, the Bureau of Fleet Management shall make a determination that the lifetime use and mileage of the vehicle has been maximized and that it would not be feasible for another state agency to use the vehicle. (4)  The department, institution or agency shall maintain proper documentation which provides the intended use of the vehicle and the basis for choosing the vehicle.  Such documentation shall show that the department, institution or agency made diligent efforts to purchase, rent, lease or acquire a vehicle that is the lowest cost vehicle for its intended use.  Such documentation shall be updated as needed when the intended use of the vehicle or any other facts concerning the vehicle are changed.  All such documentation shall be approved by the State Fleet Officer prior to purchase, rental, lease or acquisition or change in use of any vehicle and shall be maintained and made available for review by the State Auditor, any other reviewing agency and the Legislature.  The Bureau of Fleet Management shall immediately notify the department head of any agency that has a vehicle found to be in violation of the bureau's rules and regulations.  At the same time, the bureau shall notify the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the Lieutenant Governor of its findings regarding any such vehicle.  If the violation is not rectified within five (5) days of the notice, then the bureau may seize the vehicle and dispose of it as the bureau deems to be in the best interest of the State of Mississippi. (5)  On or before September 1 of each year, the Bureau of Fleet Management shall prepare and deliver to the Senate and House Appropriations Committees and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee a report containing any irregularities that it finds concerning purchases of state-owned vehicles. (6)  The Bureau of Fleet Management shall conduct an annual utilization review of all state-owned vehicles and prepared a report of its findings. (a)  The bureau shall adopt rules and regulations requiring agencies to report information needed to prepare this utilization, including, but not limited to, a uniform format for agency reporting, reporting deadlines, reporting the information listed in paragraph (b) of this subsection, and other pertinent information requested by the bureau to conduct this annual utilization review. (b)  The report created by the bureau shall include, but not be limited to: (i)  An annual mileage report for each vehicle, year, make and model of each vehicle, vehicle type and vehicle purpose. (ii)  Each agency's total utilization rate of all assigned vehicles, as defined by the number of vehicles which has annual mileage above the mileage in paragraph (c) of this subsection divided by the total number of vehicles assigned to the agency. (iii)  A recommendation by the bureau on disposing or reallocating underutilized vehicles to other agencies which can use the vehicle above the underutilization rate. (iv)  A list of all state-owned underutilized vehicles, as well as vehicles with a total annual mileage under the underutilization rate in paragraph (c) of this subsection, and, if provided by the agency, the agency's narrative justification for the vehicle. (c) State-owned vehicles driven less than thirteen thousand (13,000) miles a year shall be deemed underutilized, unless justified by the agency as provided in this paragraph (c). (i)  The justification shall be made in writing by the agency and provide a detailed narrative describing why the vehicle should not be deemed underutilized.  This justification shall take into account whether the vehicle is used for a specific purpose or if it is a specially made vehicle. (ii)  The justification from the agency shall be submitted annually to the bureau by a date chosen by the bureau. (d)  On or before September 1 of each year, the bureau shall prepare and deliver the results of the utilization review to the Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, the Speaker of the House and the Chairs of the Public Property Committees of the House and Senate. ( * * *67)  The Department of Public Safety and the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks may retain any vehicle seized pursuant to the forfeiture laws of this state, and the total number of vehicles assigned to each such agency shall not be reduced by the number of seized vehicles which the agency retains. ( * * *78)  The Bureau of Fleet Management, upon request, shall grant an exemption from the provisions of this section for only any vehicle assigned to a sworn officer of the Department of Public Safety or of the Agricultural and Livestock Theft Bureau of the Department of Agriculture and Commerce and used in undercover operations when the bureau determines that compliance could jeopardize the life, health or safety of the sworn officer. ( * * *89)  The provisions of this section shall not apply to any state institution of higher learning. ( * * *910)  When making requests for authority to purchase, rent, lease or acquire vehicles as provided in subsection (3) of this section, agencies shall submit the lowest cost vehicle possible to carry out its intended use.  Any such request shall be in writing from the agency head, certifying the vehicle requested is the lowest cost option available and acknowledging that any request contrary to this provision shall subject the agency head to penalties as provided in Sections 25-1-91, 31-7-55 and 31-7-57, where applicable.  The Bureau of Fleet Management shall only approve the lowest cost vehicle, which in its estimation, will carry out the intended use.  No agency may purchase any vehicle that the Bureau of Fleet Management has disapproved as being a higher cost option. ( * * *1011)  No requests authorized under subsections (3) and * * * (9) (10) of this section shall be approved by the Bureau of Fleet Management if the requesting agency has not properly maintained in the fleet/asset reporting system all information required by the Bureau of Fleet Management.  Agencies shall correct any inadequacies or discrepancies in the system noted by the Bureau of Fleet Management before the bureau may approve any requests. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.